viceverser/data/fr_ud.dic
aigu·ue/ue,,&&  po:adj
amateur·rice/,,rire&&  po:adj
ambigu·ue/,,ue&&  po:adj
archiépiscopal·e/,,al&&  po:adj
attentif·ve/,,fv&&  po:adj
autodestructeur·rice/,,ri&&  po:adj
axiomatisation/Es&&  po:noun is:fem
barlong·ue/,,gu&&  po:adj
basochien·ne/,,ll&&  po:adj
beau·elle/,,la&&  po:noun po:adj
bedeau/lx&&  po:noun is:mas
bégu·ue/,,ue&&  po:adj
bigouden·ène/,,en&&  po:noun po:adj
blablateur·euse/,,rs&&  po:noun
blaireau·elle/,,la&&  po:noun
blésois·e/,,Ee&&  po:noun po:adj
bougre·sse/,,ss&&  po:noun
boulevardier·ère/,,rr&&  po:noun po:adj
bref·ève/,,ev&&  po:noun po:adj
bruineux·euse/,,xz&&  po:adj
bushman/GB&&  po:noun is:mas
caduc·que/,,qc&&  po:adj
canardeau/lx&&  po:noun is:mas
carcéral·e/,,al&&  po:adj
chaînier·ère/,,rr&&  po:noun
châtellenie/Es&&  po:noun is:fem
choupinet·te/,,ll&&  po:noun
chronométreur·euse/,,rs&&  po:noun
columbarium/LT&&  po:noun is:mas
comte·sse/,,ss&&  po:noun
concret·ète/,,et&&  po:adj
confessionnal/lx&&  po:noun is:mas
conservateur·rice/,,ri&&  po:noun po:adj
contigu·ue/,,ue&&  po:adj
contrastif·ve/,,fv&&  po:adj
couenneux·euse/,,xz&&  po:adj
crash/GB&&  po:noun is:mas
cuisinier·ère/,,rr&&  po:noun
culminant·e/,,Ee&&  po:adj
de/El  po:adp is:eli
dégrossissement/Es&&  po:noun is:mas
démonteur·euse/,,rs&&  po:noun
dénotationnel·le/,,ll&&  po:adj
destinateur·rice/,,ri&&  po:noun po:adj
désuet·ète/,,et&&  po:adj
discret·ète/,,et&&  po:noun po:adj
dispersif·ve/,,fv&&  po:adj
doux·ce/,,xc&&  po:noun po:adj
drôle·sse/,,ss&&  po:noun
eau/lx&&  po:noun is:fem
électoral·e/,,al&&  po:adj
engreneur·euse/,,rs&&  po:noun
ensellé·e/,,Ee&&Is  po:adj
esquimaude/Es&&  po:adj is:epi
excité·e/,,Ee&&  po:noun
exigu·ue/,,ue&&  po:adj
exportateur·rice/,,ri&&  po:noun po:adj
faux·sse/,,xs&&  po:noun po:adj
ferrugineux·euse/,,xz&&  po:adj
festif·ve/,,fv&&  po:adj
fontenaisien·ne/,,ll&&  po:noun po:adj
foramen/LT&&  po:noun is:mas
formier·ère/,,rr&&  po:noun
fou·olle/,,lu&&  po:noun po:adj
fugueur·euse/,,rs&&  po:noun po:adj
gentleman/GB&&  po:noun is:mas
gonze·sse/,,ss&&  po:noun
grec·que/,,qc&&  po:noun po:adj
grigneux·euse/,,xz&&  po:adj
guindeau/lx&&  po:noun is:mas
hadj/Es&&  po:noun is:mas
impressionnant·e/,,Ee&&  po:adj
incomplet·ète/,,et&&  po:noun po:adj
inducteur·rice/,,ri&&  po:adj
inquiet·ète/,,et&&  po:adj
intercommunal·e/,,al&&  po:adj
intéroceptif·ve/,,fv&&  po:adj
je/El  po:pron is:1sg is:epi
journalier·ère/,,rr&&  po:noun po:adj
jumeau·elle/,,la&&  po:noun po:adj
képi/Es&&  po:noun is:mas
lady/GB&&  po:noun is:fem
la/El  po:det is:sg is:fem is:eli st:le·là
la/El&&  po:noun is:mas is:inv is:eli st:le·là
largueur·euse/,,rs&&  po:noun
le/El  po:det is:sg is:mas is:eli st:le·la
lépreux·euse/,,xz&&  po:noun po:adj
logisticien·ne/,,ll&&  po:noun
long·ue/,,gu&&  po:adj
lorsque/El  po:sconj is:eli
mafioso/LT&&  po:noun is:mas
marri·e/,,Ee&&  po:adj
mire·sse/,,ss&&  po:noun
modérateur·rice/,,ri&&  po:noun po:adj
moreau/lx&&  po:noun is:mas
morutier·ère/,,rr&&  po:adj
mou·olle/,,lu&&  po:adj
multifamilial·e/,,al&&  po:adj
myxoedémateux·euse/,,xz&&  po:adj
néogrec·que/,,qc&&  po:adj
nouveau·elle/,,la&&  po:noun po:adj
oblatif·ve/,,fv&&  po:adj
oblong·ue/,,gu&&  po:adj
paddy/GB&&  po:noun is:mas
pagus/LT&&  po:noun is:mas
parapublic·que/,,qc&&  po:adj
péléen·ne/,,ll&&  po:adj
péripate/Es&&  po:noun is:mas
piqueux·euse/,,xz&&  po:noun po:adj
pitaud·e/,,Ee&&  po:noun po:adj
pizzaiolo/LT&&  po:noun is:mas
poète·sse/,,ee&&  po:noun
pomiculteur·rice/,,ri&&  po:noun
pontifical·e/,,al&&  po:adj
postier·ère/,,rr&&  po:noun
prêtre·sse/,,ss&&  po:noun
prophète·sse/,,ee&&  po:noun
public·que/,,qc&&  po:adj
puceau·elle/,,la&&  po:noun po:adj
puisque/El  po:sconj is:eli
quelque/El  po:sconj is:eli
quiet·ète/,,et&&  po:adj
radeau/lx&&  po:noun is:mas
rameur·euse/,,rs&&  po:noun
recordman/GB&&  po:noun is:mas
régularisateur·rice/,,ri&&  po:adj
sablonneux·euse/,,xz&&  po:adj
scriptorium/LT&&  po:noun is:mas
sec·èche/,,ec&&  po:noun po:adj
secret·ète/,,et&&  po:noun po:adj
séropositif·ve/,,fv&&  po:noun po:adj
sourcilier·ère/,,rr&&  po:adj
sphinctérien·ne/,,ll&&  po:adj
spire/Es&&  po:noun is:fem
subaigu·ue/,,ue&&  po:adj
sublétal·e/,,al&&  po:adj
suraigu·ue/,,ue&&  po:adj
taximan/GB&&  po:noun is:mas
toccata/LT&&  po:noun is:fem
tourangeau·elle/,,la&&  po:noun po:adj
trijumeau·elle/,,la&&  po:noun
tuffeau/lx&&  po:noun is:mas
turc·que/,,qc&&  po:noun po:adj
vicomte·sse/,,ss&&  po:noun
vieillard·e/,,Ee&&  po:noun
vieux·eille/,,xl&&  po:noun po:adj
visionneur·euse/,,rs&&  po:noun
